Hawaii statutes.
§431:7-204 In lieu provision. As to
insurers, the taxes and fees imposed by section 431:7-201 to section 431:7-204,
and the fees imposed by this code, when paid shall be in settlement of and in
lieu of all demands for taxes, licenses, or fees of every character imposed by
the laws of this State, the ordinances or other laws, rules, or regulations of
any county of this State, except:

(1) As expressly otherwise provided;

(2) Taxes on real property;

(3) Taxes on the purchase, use, or ownership of
tangible personal property; and

(4) Taxes on gross income, gross proceeds, gross
rental, or gross rental proceeds under chapter 237 or 237D.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to exempt
insurers from liability for withholding taxes payable by their employees and
paying the same to the proper collection officers, or from keeping such
records, and making such returns and reports, as may be required in the case of
other persons enjoying tax exemption. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1991, c
286, §4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next